Florida, session 2026, SB1504.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSubsection (3) of section 626.7351, Florida 15 Statutes, is amended to read: 16 626.7351âQualifications for customer representativeâs 17 license.âThe department shall not grant or issue a license as 18 customer representative to any individual found by it to be 19 untrustworthy or incompetent, or who does not meet each of the 20 following qualifications: 21 (3)âWithin 4 years preceding the date that the application 22 for license was filed with the department, the applicant has 23 earned the designation of Accredited Advisor in Insurance (AAI), 24 Associate in General Insurance (AINS), or Accredited Customer 25 Service Representative (ACSR) from the Insurance Institute of 26 America; the designation of Certified Insurance Counselor (CIC) 27 from the Society of Certified Insurance Service Counselors; the 28 designation of Certified Professional Service Representative 29 (CPSR) from the National Foundation for CPSR; the designation of 30 Certified Insurance Service Representative (CISR) from the 31 Society of Certified Insurance Service Representatives; the 32 designation of Certified Insurance Representative (CIR) from 33 All-Lines Training; the designation of Chartered Customer 34 Service Representative (CCSR) from American Insurance College; 35 the designation of Professional Customer Service Representative 36 (PCSR) from the Professional Career Institute; the designation 37 of Insurance Customer Service Representative (ICSR) from 38 Statewide Insurance Associates LLC; the designation of 39 Registered Customer Service Representative (RCSR) from a 40 regionally accredited postsecondary institution in the state 41 whose curriculum is approved by the department and includes 42 comprehensive analysis of basic property and casualty lines of 43 insurance and testing which demonstrates mastery of the subject; 44 a diploma from a Florida high school in which the applicant 45 completed the insurance and personal finance course provided in 46 s. 1003.4207; or a degree from an accredited institution of 47 higher learning approved by the department when the degree 48 includes a minimum of 9 credit hours of insurance instruction, 49 including specific instruction in the areas of property, 50 casualty, and inland marine insurance. The department shall 51 adopt rules establishing standards for the approval of 52 curriculum. 53 Section 2.âSection 1003.4207, Florida Statutes, is created 54 to read: 55 1003.4207âInsurance and personal finance course.âNo later 56 than January 1, 2027, the Department of Education, in 57 consultation with the Department of Financial Services, shall 58 develop a 0.5 credit course in insurance and personal finance 59 which is available to school districts for use beginning with 60 the 2027-2028 school year. The course must include a 61 comprehensive analysis of basic property and casualty lines of 62 insurance consistent with the instructional designations 63 provided under s. 626.7351(3). 64 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.